District of Columbia statutes.
31-3302.09

Construction.

Nothing in this subchapter shall be construed to:

(1)

Restrict the amount of the premium rates that an issuer may charge an individual for health insurance coverage provided in the individual market; or

(2)

Prevent a health insurer offering health insurance coverage in the individual market from establishing premium discounts or rebates or modifying otherwise applicable copayments or deductibles in return for adherence to programs of health promotion and disease prevention.

History

Apr. 13, 1999, D.C. Law 12-209, § 209, 45 DCR 8433

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 35-1030.

Temporary Addition of Section

See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 31-3301.01.

Emergency Legislation

See notes to § 31-3301.01.